Idaho, session 2025, H0179.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1609, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1609. DEFINITIONS. For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Abstinence" means the absence of any sexual activity prior to mar-
riage, which activity includes physical contact between individuals involv-
ing intimate or private areas of the body that can potentially:
(a) Result in pregnancy;
(b) Transmit sexually transmitted diseases and infections; or
(c) Present emotional risks.
(2) "Human sexuality" means sexual conduct, sexual pleasure, sexual
intimacy, sexual abuse, sexual violence, eroticism, pornography, deviant
sexual behavior, sexual attraction, sexual orientation, or any form of sex-
ual identity, gender identity, gender ideology, or gender conversion.
(2) (3) "Sex education" means the study of the anatomy and the physiol-
ogy of human reproduction.
SECTION 2. That Section 33-1611, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1611. EXCUSING CHILDREN FROM INSTRUCTION IN SEX EDUCATION -- RE-
QUIRING PERMISSION FOR INSTRUCTION IN HUMAN SEXUALITY. (1) Any parent or le-
gal guardian of a child who wishes to have his such child excused from any
planned instruction in sex education may do so upon by filing a written re-
quest to the school district board of trustees and the. The board of trustees
shall make available the appropriate forms for such request. Alternative
educational endeavors shall be provided for those children who have been ex-
cused from such instruction.
(2) Prior to any child attending instruction that addresses human
sexuality as specifically and narrowly defined in section 33-1609, Idaho
Code, regardless of whether such instruction is offered by regular or guest
instructors, the school district offering such instruction shall notify
parents and legal guardians of children who are eligible to attend such in-
struction no less than two (2) weeks before the date that such instruction
will begin. The school district shall provide the parent or legal guardian
with a brief description of the content of the instruction in human sexuality


and such parent or legal guardian shall have the opportunity to review any
materials that will be used in the instruction. The school district shall
not permit any child to attend such instruction unless the parent or legal
guardian of such child submits a signed and written permission form, within
one (1) week of the commencement of the instruction, to the board of trustees
granting the school district permission to allow the child to attend the in-
struction. For any child whose parents do not provide the written permission
form provided for in this section, alternative educational instruction that
furthers the completion of any grade level or graduation requirements and
does not address human sexuality as defined in section 33-1609, Idaho Code,
shall be provided to such child.
(3) A parent or legal guardian of a child who was provided any instruc-
tion regarding human sexuality as defined in section 33-1609, Idaho Code,
without the required signed and written permission form shall provide writ-
ten notice to the board of trustees or its designee that the instruction oc-
curred. In such notice, a parent or legal guardian may:
(a) Provide retroactive permission for the child to receive such in-
struction; or
(b) Ask the board of trustees for rectification.
(4) Upon receipt of the notice pursuant to subsection (3) of this sec-
tion, a board of trustees shall file any retroactive permission granted or
provide rectification to a parent or legal guardian within thirty (30) days
of receipt of such notice. If the board fails to provide adequate rectifica-
tion, the parent or legal guardian who provided the notice pursuant to sub-
section (3) of this section shall have a cause of action against the board of
trustees.
(5) Any parent or legal guardian of a child who prevails in an action
brought under this section may recover two hundred fifty dollars ($250) in
statutory damages as well as actual damages and any other relief available
by law, including but not limited to injunctive relief sufficient to prevent
the defendant school district board of trustees from violating the require-
ments of this section.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.